Tennessee, session 114, HB0644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 11, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
All hospitals licensed by the health facilities commission or by the department of
mental health and substance abuse services shall report annually to the department of
health, on a form promulgated by the department, the number of advanced practice
registered nurses who are working in the hospital for each month. The department may
promulgate a reporting form and establish the reporting period and dates for submission.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0644
001878
- 1 -